Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 8

Relocation of Utilities

54-5-801. Declaration of policy.

The construction of modern highways is necessary to promote public safety, facilitate the movement of present day motor traffic, both interstate and intrastate in character, and to promote the national defense, and in the construction of the highways it is also in the public interest to provide for the orderly and economical relocation of utilities when made necessary by highway improvements, including extensions of highways within urban areas, without occasioning utility service interruptions or unnecessary hazards to the health, safety and welfare of the traveling or utility consuming public.

Utilities have been authorized by statute or charter provisions for many years to locate their facilities within the boundaries of public roads and streets in this state, because utilities are vital to the health, safety and welfare of the citizens of this state, and further:

The business and activities of utilities involve the rendition of essential public services to large numbers of the general public, and no cessation of utility service is permitted without authority of law;

The financing of utilities involves the investment of large sums of money, obtained from municipal funds and subscribing members of the general public;

The development and extension of utilities directly and vitally affect the development, growth and expansion of the general welfare, business and industry of this state; and

All persons in this state are actual or potential consumers of one (1) or more utility services, and all consumers will be affected by the cost of relocation of their utilities as necessary to accommodate highway improvements.

Public highways and streets are intended principally for public travel and transportation; but they are also intended for proper utility uses in serving the public, as authorized by charter provisions or other applicable laws of this state, and the utility uses are for the benefit of the public served. Without making use of public ways, utility lines could not reach or economically service the adjacent public, particularly in urban areas.

Federal aid highways of the interstate system, including extensions of the highways in urban areas, serve the need of nonlocal and long distance traffic.

The municipality that owns and operates its own utilities is a political subdivision of the state and lawfully holds all of its utility properties, real and personal, and other facilities in a proprietary capacity, and owns or has a real property interest in the streets, easements and other public ways in, under, and over which the utility facilities are installed.

The obligation of the utility relocations is a burden on the public in this state, whether initially borne by the state or the municipally or cooperatively owned utility or in part by both, and it is, therefore, in the public interest that the burden be minimized to the extent that same can be done consistently with the principal purpose of the streets and highways for vehicular movement of persons and property; therefore, it is the intent of the general assembly to ensure that the state's police power in requiring relocation of utilities shall be exercised in a reasonable manner.

Utility relocations necessitated by construction of the interstate highway system, extensions of the highway system, or improvements to the highway system are a public governmental function, properly a part of the construction, and, to the extent in this part provided, utility relocations shall be made at state expense; however, although made in obedience to the commissioner's orders in exercise of the police power under this part, relocations under this part for which compensation is not provided by this part or otherwise by law are declared to be damnum absque injuria and no claim therefor shall be enforceable against the state. Utility relocations to which this part are applicable shall be made only in pursuance of this part.

The statements in this section are legislative determinations and declarations of public policy, and this part shall be liberally construed in conformity with its declarations and purposes to promote the public interest.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 368, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-562.

Cross-References. Relocation of utilities for road improvement purposes, title 54, ch. 22.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 48.

1. Constitutionality.

This part was not unconstitutional under Tenn. Const., art. II, § 31, as authorizing the expenditure of state funds for other than a public purpose. Pack v. Southern Bell Tel. & Tel. Co., 215 Tenn. 503, 387 S.W.2d 789, 1965 Tenn. LEXIS 668 (1965).

This part was not unconstitutional as providing for an unreasonable classification or as amounting to special legislation. Pack v. Southern Bell Tel. & Tel. Co., 215 Tenn. 503, 387 S.W.2d 789, 1965 Tenn. LEXIS 668 (1965).

Collateral References. Highways
88.

Electricity
9.

Municipal corporations
679 et seq.

54-5-802. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Betterment” means any upgrading of the facility being relocated that is not attributable to the highway construction and is made solely for the benefit of, and at the election of, the utility;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation;

“Cost of relocation” means the entire amount paid by or on behalf of the utility properly attributable to the relocation after deducting from that amount any betterment of the new facility and any salvage value derived from the old facility. The cost of relocation may include, but is not limited to, engineering, removal, and installation costs, but shall not include inspection costs or the cost of any betterment to the utility's facilities;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Public highway” means any highway included on the state highway system or interstate system and any highway, road or street that is owned, maintained, or owned and maintained by a county or municipality, including the right-of-way for the highway, road or street;

“Relocation” means the adjustment of a utility facility as the commissioner determines is necessary or appropriate in connection with the construction or reconstruction of a public highway. Relocation includes:

Removing and reinstalling the utility facility, including necessary temporary facilities;

Moving, rearranging or changing the type of existing facilities;

Taking any necessary safety and protective measures; and

The construction of a replacement facility that is both functionally equivalent to, but not a betterment of, the existing facility and necessary for continuous operation of the utility service, the project economy or sequence of highway construction;

“Salvage value” means the amount received from the sale of utility property that has been removed or, if retained for reuse, the amount at which the recovered material is charged to the utility's accounts; and

“Utility” means a privately, publicly or cooperatively owned line, facility or system used, available for use or formerly used to transmit or distribute communications, electricity, gas, liquids, steam, sewerage, or other materials to the public.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 368, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-563; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2003, ch. 86, § 1.

54-5-803. Relocation of utility facilities authorized — Obligations of utility — Agreements for relocation and cost.

The commissioner may by order, after notice and hearing, provide for the relocation of utility facilities within a public highway, including, if required, the entire removal from the public highway of certain facilities except as necessary to serve abutting premises or as necessary to cross the highway, and may require any utility as defined in § 54-5-802 to make or suffer the specified relocation, upon a finding that the action provided for is necessitated by highway improvement determined by the commissioner as a matter of policy relating to the design, construction, location and maintenance of public highways. The commissioner shall direct and control the reasonable manner and time of effecting the relocation so as to promote the public interest in the highway improvement without undue cost or risk and without impairment of utility service, whether the commissioner undertakes the relocation on behalf of the state or requires the utility to perform the relocation. If undertaken by the commissioner, the commissioner may contract the relocation work.

The obligations of the utility, as defined in § 54-5-802, shall be to make or suffer relocation required by the commissioner, and to relocate cooperatively and in the reasonable manner and time as prescribed by the commissioner, and to advance and pay all costs incurred in effecting relocation that the state is not authorized to pay under this part or otherwise by law. It shall not be grounds for delay in relocation that a dispute exists over the cost of relocation or the method of paying or sharing the cost.

The commissioner is authorized to enter into an agreement with a utility as defined in § 54-5-802 with respect to any relocation, the time and manner of its accomplishment and the payment and sharing of the cost incurred in effecting relocation, all upon reasonable terms and conditions that the commissioner approves as necessary or appropriate in the interest of a public highway program in this state. No notice, hearing or other proceeding under this part shall be required.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 368, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-564.

Cross-References. Relocation of utilities for road improvement purposes, title 54, ch. 22.

The utility shall fully comply with § 54-5-854(b), including the preparation and submission to the department of the utility's relocation plan, cost estimate and schedule of calendar days for completing the relocation, within the time period specified or within an additional time that may be allowed under § 54-5-854(b); and

The utility shall either:

Enter into a written agreement with the commissioner to include the relocation as a part of the department's highway construction contract; provided, however, that the agreement may provide that the utility shall perform certain relocation work with its own union employees as required under a negotiated organized labor contract; but, in that case, the utility shall be required to reimburse the department for all relocation costs if it fails to timely perform its relocation work as provided in the agreement with the commissioner; or

Enter into a written agreement with the commissioner to remove all utility facilities that conflict with the highway construction, as determined by the department, prior to the letting of the department's construction contract, and otherwise perform and complete the utility relocation in accordance with approved relocation plans and schedule of calendar days; provided, however, that the agreement may provide that, in the event that the department does not undertake the highway construction project within a specified time, the utility shall be reimbursed for the relocation work it has timely performed in accordance with the approved plans and schedule.

The department shall make no reimbursement payment to a utility as authorized under subsection (a), unless and until the commissioner is satisfied that the relocation has been performed in accordance with the relocation plans and schedule of calendar days approved by the department.

To ensure that the department never pays any cost of relocation for which it cannot receive proportionate reimbursement under any federal aid highway act, if the United States department of transportation finally determines that the cost of relocation is not reimbursable to the department from federal funds, or that the cost of relocation is less than the amount reimbursed to the utility by the department, the utility so reimbursed shall repay to the department the difference between the amount reimbursed to the utility and the cost of relocation finally determined by the department.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 368, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-565; Acts 1984, ch. 817, § 1; 1999, ch. 450, § 5; 2003, ch. 86, § 2.

Cross-References. Relocation of utilities for road improvement purposes, title 54, ch. 22.

Attorney General Opinions. The department of transportation is not obligated under § 54-5-804 to reimburse a utility for the cost of the relocation of the utility's facilities within county road right-of-way when the department undertakes a project for a county to replace a county bridge, OAG 03-162 (12/12/03).

Cited: Metro. Gov't of Nashville v. Bellsouth Telcomms., Inc., 502 F. Supp. 2d 747, 2007 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 51454 (M.D. Tenn. July 13, 2007).

Any party aggrieved by the order or decision of the chancery court may appeal from the order or decision to the supreme court in accordance with the rules for appeals in civil cases.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 368, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-566; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 368, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-567; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-5-804. State to pay certain relocation costs — Exceptions — Reimbursement payments.

The commissioner is authorized to reimburse a utility for the cost of relocation, and to include the cost as a highway construction project cost, where the cost of relocation arises from the relocation of a utility facility located on a public highway right-of-way and the highway construction project is undertaken by the department, subject to the following conditions:

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the utility shall be responsible, at its own expense, to inspect all phases of the utility relocation to ensure that the removal, installation, or removal and installation of the utility facility is done in accordance with all applicable specifications and safety codes.

The cost of relocation for which a utility may be reimbursed under subsection (a) shall nevertheless be borne in full by the utility without reimbursement by the department where, if required by law, the utility does not have a valid permit to locate on the public highway right-of-way from the department or from the county or municipality having jurisdiction over the right-of-way.

54-5-805. Hearing — Notice — Rules and regulations promulgated by commissioner — Appeals.

All hearings held under this part shall be public and upon not less than a fifteen-day written notice of the time, place and purpose of the hearing to each utility whose services or facilities may be affected, and to each municipality in which any part of the proposed highway improvement is to be located. Hearings may be held before the commissioner, or any representative designated by the commissioner, and at a place designated in the notice.

A record of the testimony shall be taken at the hearing and a transcript of the hearing furnished to anyone upon request and payment of the cost of the transcript.

The findings and orders shall be in writing and a copy of the findings and orders served upon the parties to the proceedings.

The commissioner may promulgate rules to govern proceedings under this part.

Any party aggrieved by any order may appeal to the chancery court of Davidson County within thirty (30) days of the entry of the order by filing a petition for review of the order. Upon receiving notice of the order, it shall be the duty of the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized agent to prepare and transmit a transcript of the record of the hearing, including all testimony, findings and orders, which shall be the record in the cause. If it is made to appear to the court that the order appealed from is unreasonable or unlawful, the order shall be vacated and annulled and the entire matter remanded to the commissioner for further proceeding consistent with the decision of the court; provided, that the appeal shall not operate as a stay of any order of the commissioner unless the court so orders.

54-5-806. Applicability of this part.

The policy, principles and reimbursement provisions of this part shall apply equally to all other utilities, whether public, private or cooperatively owned, that furnish utility service including, but not limited to, water, electric power, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, steam, fuel gas and telephone or telegraph service through a system of pipes, conduits, cables, or wires devoted to public utility service.

The policy, principles, and reimbursement provisions of this part shall apply to any and all highway projects that have not been completed on April 1, 1963, even though prior to April 1, 1963, the commissioner has required agreements with the affected utilities concerning the relocation work. The commissioner is authorized and directed to amend any and all existing agreements so as to conform to this part.

54-5-807. Nonapplicability of part.

This part shall not apply to:

Any taking or damaging of property for which the utility is entitled to compensation pursuant to the constitution of this state or the United States or pursuant to any binding agreement inuring to the utility's benefit; and

Any relocation of utility facilities located outside the boundaries of public streets, roads or highways.

Acts 1963, ch. 368, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-568.

54-5-808 — 54-5-850. [Reserved.]

The general assembly declares that it is the purpose of this section and §§ 54-5-852 — 54-5-856 to regulate the removal, relocation, or adjustment of utility facilities occupying rights-of-way of highways when construction by the department makes removal, relocation, or adjustment necessary.

Acts 1988, ch. 517, § 1.

54-5-852. Definitions for §§ 54-5-851 — 54-5-856.

As used in § 54-5-851, this section and §§ 54-5-853 — 54-5-856, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Approximate vertical and horizontal locations of underground utility facilities” means the depth below the existing ground line in accordance with the best information available to the owner, and the location on a strip of land at least four feet (4') wide but not wider than the width of the utility facility plus two feet (2') on either side of the utility facility;

“Calendar days” means all days shown on the calendar;

“Complete project plans” means the plans, including existing topography and proposed grades, that have been developed by the department for use in acquiring rights-of-way and/or negotiating with owners for installation, relocation or adjustment of utility facilities relative to construction. Additions or changes to the plans shall be given to the utilities as soon as they are available;

“Construction” means the work required to construct or reconstruct a highway in accordance with the plans and specifications;

“Department” means the Tennessee department of transportation;

“Highway” means a highway, road, or street that will be the subject of construction pursuant to a contract to be entered into between the department and a contractor;

“Owner” means the owner, operator, user or joint user of utility facilities; and

“Utility facility” means lines, pipes or other systems used, available for use, or formerly used to transmit or distribute communications, electricity, gas, liquids, steam, sewerage, or other materials.

Acts 1988, ch. 517, § 2; 1999, ch. 452, §§ 8, 9.

54-5-853. Notification of owners — Response — Failure to reply.

Before beginning construction, the department shall identify and notify the owners of utility facilities that occupy or may occupy the rights-of-way of all highways described in the notice on which construction is proposed to be performed, by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the designated representative of the owners. The department shall make every reasonable effort to identify the current and correct mailing address for each such owner in order to give actual notice to the appropriate personnel responsible for planning the relocation or adjustment of utility facilities of each owner.

Within sixty (60) days following the receipt of notice from the department, the owner shall inform the department, in care of the person sending the notice at the address listed in the notice, whether or not it is the owner of the utility facilities and if so, the type of utility service, description and general location of each facility.

For each owner to whom a notice is sent and for whom no response is received by the department within sixty (60) days as to whether or not the owner has utility facilities at the highway location described in the notice, the department shall provide a second notice by certified mail, return receipt requested.

Within ten (10) days following the receipt of the second notice from the department, any owner so notified shall inform the department, in care of the person sending the second notice at the address listed in the notice, whether or not it is the owner of the utility facilities and if so, the type of utility service, description and general location of each facility.

The failure of an owner to comply with this section shall create a presumption that it is not such an owner, and the department and its contractor may then undertake construction without liability to the owner for damages to the owner's utility facilities, and in addition, the owner shall be liable to the department's contractor for damages resulting from the failure.

Acts 1988, ch. 517, § 3.

54-5-854. Project plans — Copies — Marking, approval, and changes — Liability — Civil penalties.

When the department is informed of the existence of utility facilities pursuant to § 54-5-853, it shall provide each owner with a set of complete project plans either by providing the owner with a paper copy or a digital copy. The plans may be transmitted by hand delivery or return receipt mail, or by electronic transmission of a digital copy. Digital copies shall be in the format, and subject to such restrictions on use, as the department may specify.

Within one hundred twenty (120) calendar days following the receipt of the plans, the owner shall mark on the plans, or on a copy of the plans, the approximate vertical and horizontal locations of underground utility facilities, approximate horizontal location of above-ground utility facilities, a description of each of its existing utility facilities and any proposed new location of the facilities and additional facilities within all rights-of-way shown on the project plans, and prepare a plan and a schedule of calendar days to accomplish the proposed new location. The project plans, or a copy of the plans, and the plan and schedule of calendar days, shall be returned to the department in care of the person whose name and address are listed on the project plans. Should coordination with other owners be required in order for an owner to prepare a plan and schedule of calendar days, or should changes to the project plans cause the utility to alter its relocation plan or schedule, then additional time shall be allowed, but in no case shall the additional time exceed the original one hundred twenty (120) calendar days by more than an additional forty-five (45) calendar days.

After the owner has submitted its plan and schedule of calendar days, the department may approve them if reasonable, or the department may otherwise reasonably direct the owner to install, relocate or adjust its utility facilities in accordance with an approved plan and schedule of calendar days. The department shall communicate approval or direction to the owner via certified mail.

The department shall establish the date on which the owner may begin the installation, relocation or adjustment of its utility facilities, and the owner shall be given reasonable advance notice of the date by certified mail via a notice to proceed. The owner shall be free to order the required materials associated with the proposed utility relocation or adjustment at this time. No owner shall be notified to begin installation, relocation or adjustment until all health, governmental, and environmental regulatory agencies have approved the submitted plan where applicable.

In the event the department and the owner fail to agree on a reasonable plan and schedule of calendar days to install, relocate or adjust the utility, the owner may proceed with the approved schedule under a reservation of rights notice to the department. The notice shall be filed within ten (10) days of the issuance of a notice to proceed by the department. The notice shall contain the owner's objections to the relocation schedule and shall state the reasons for the objections. The reservation of rights shall become a part of the administrative record for any subsequent contested case. If any subsequent contested case results in a revised plan and schedule of calendar days, then any penalty under subsections (g) and (h), shall be determined on the basis of the revised schedule.

After the owner has completed the installation, relocation or adjustment, or any part of the installation, relocation or adjustment, and the department requires any additional relocation or adjustment, the department shall reimburse the owner for the cost incurred.

The department shall give its contractor and the owner notice of any change in highway construction that would require any additional relocation or adjustment and the owner shall be given an agreed reasonable time to accomplish the work. In addition, the department shall reimburse the owner for the costs of all materials that have been purchased in association with the utility relocation or adjustment that cannot be utilized as a result of the change in the project.

The department's contractor shall be liable for any damages negligently inflicted to the owner's utility facilities occurring during the time provided in the schedule of calendar days for installation, relocation or adjustment, or during the approved time for any additional relocation or adjustment.

If any owner fails to comply with and implement this section, the contractor, with the consent of the department, may then undertake construction without liability to the owner for damages to the owner's utility facilities, and in addition, the owner shall be liable to the department's contractor for damages resulting from the failure.

If the owner fails to complete the required installation, relocation or adjustment of its utility facilities within the approved schedule of calendar days as approved by the department, the commissioner of transportation shall have the authority to assess and collect from the owner a civil penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) for each calendar day after the scheduled completion date that the owner fails to complete the required installation, relocation or adjustment. Owners having less than three thousand (3,000) customers shall be subject to the assessment of a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per calendar day when the owner fails to complete the required installation, relocation or adjustment of its utility facilities within the approved schedule of calendar days.

The failure of another owner to sufficiently complete its required installation, relocation or adjustment of utilities that interferes with the owner's relocation plan shall constitute an affirmative defense to the assessment of a civil penalty pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (h) to the contrary, no civil penalty shall be assessed for delays that result from catastrophic weather events or acts of God.

During the course of the utility relocation phase of the project, each owner that is installing, relocating or adjusting its utility facilities shall furnish the department and all other such owners with monthly progress reports regarding the status of the relocation of its utility facility, until its relocation is completed. It shall be sufficient to comply with this subsection (h) if the owner regularly reports progress during the course of pre-construction meetings held by the contractor and the department. The content of the reports shall be reflected in the minutes of the meetings and the minutes shall constitute the monthly progress report required under this subdivision (h)(3), whether or not the meetings are held on a monthly basis.

The department shall give the owner written notice of the intent to assess a civil penalty and the opportunity to appear before the commissioner or the commissioner's designee to show cause why the penalty should not be assessed. Upon finding that a civil penalty should be assessed, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall issue an appropriate order to the owner. If the civil penalty has not been paid in full within ninety (90) days after the entry of the order, the matter shall be turned over to the attorney general and reporter for collection, and the owner shall be liable for all expenses associated with the enforcement action, including court costs and attorneys' fees.

Appeals of any decision to assess a civil penalty pursuant to this section shall be undertaken pursuant to the normal procedures for appeal of agency decisions in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3.

The moneys collected as civil penalties under this subsection (h) shall be paid into the fund set aside for the utility relocation loan program established under § 67-3-901.

Acts 1988, ch. 517, § 4; 1999, ch. 452, §§ 1-6; 2002, ch. 675, § 1; 2012, ch. 602, § 1.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, in (a), substituted “a set of complete project plans either by providing the owner with a paper copy or a digital copy” for “at least two (2) sets of complete project plans by certified mail or hand delivery” in the first sentence and added the second and third sentences.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 602, § 2. March 21, 2012.

54-5-855. Revised cost estimate — Reimbursement of engineering costs.

In the event the department does not notify the owner by certified mail of the approved plan and schedule of calendar days and date for beginning installation, relocation or adjustment within six (6) months after their submission, then the owner shall be allowed to submit a revised cost estimate, when applicable, which shall be incorporated into the utility relocation contract.

In the event the department does not undertake the proposed project within one (1) year after the final approval of the utility relocation plan, the department shall reimburse the owner for all costs of engineering.

Acts 1988, ch. 517, § 5; 1999, ch. 452, § 7.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

54-5-856. Liaison between owner and contractor.

The department's resident engineer shall act as liaison between the owner and the department's contractor on any project to which §§ 54-5-851 — 54-5-855 and this section are applicable.

Acts 1988, ch. 517, § 6.